apertium-en.en.dix
        <pardef n="dblR__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>red</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
        <pardef n="dblN__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ns</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ned</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="dblT__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ted</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        <pardef n="d/ig__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ig</l><r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igs</l><r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ug</l><r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
                <pardef n="eat__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
                    <pardef n="ate__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="g/et__vblex">
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ets</l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    
                <pardef n="t">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="t"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            <pardef n="tmmood">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tmmood"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tsuch">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tsuch"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tout">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tout"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tw">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tw"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="tell">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tell"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
        <pardef n="steadw">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="steadw"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="tout"/></e>
<e lm="he"><i>he</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="she"><i>she</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="you"><i>you</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="we"><i>we</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="anything"><i>anything</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="nothing"><i>nothing</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="something"><i>something</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="other"><i>other</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="fat"><i>fat</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="large"><i>large</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="heavyset"><i>heavyset</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="stocky"><i>stocky</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="thickset"><i>thickset</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="dumpy"><i>dumpy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="podgy"><i>podgy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="pudgy"><i>pudgy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="a lot"><i>a<b/>lot</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="good"><i>good</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="very"><i>very</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="foolish"><i>foolish</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="stupid"><i>stupid</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="little"><i>little</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="old"><i>old</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="disused"><i>disused</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="obsolescent"><i>obsolescent</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="obsolete"><i>obsolete</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="out-of-date"><i>out-of-date</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="outdated"><i>outdated</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="leaning"><i>leaning</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="tipped"><i>tipped</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="tilted"><i>tilted</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="sloped"><i>sloped</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="angled"><i>angled</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="slanted"><i>slanted</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="canted"><i>canted</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="slanted"><i>slanted</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="left-handed"><i>left-handed</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="negative"><i>negative</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="nope"><i>nope</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="no way"><i>no<b/>way</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="yes"><i>yes</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="yeah"><i>yeah</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="yeh"><i>yeh</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="tell"/></e>
<e lm="between"><i>between</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="dig"><i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="get"><i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eat"><i>eat</i><par n="eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scoff"><i>scoff</i><par n="eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ate"><i>ate</i><par n="ate__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scoffed"><i>scoffed</i><par n="ate__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="must"><i>must</i><par n="tmmood"/></e>
<e lm="maybe"><i>maybe</i><par n="tmmood"/></e>
<e lm="pregnant"><i>pregnant</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="with child"><i>with<b/>child</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="expectant"><i>expectant</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="great"><i>great</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="corking"><i>corking</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="cracking"><i>cracking</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="peachy"><i>peachy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="dirty"><i>dirty</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="naughty"><i>naughty</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="under obligation"><i>under<b/>obligation</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="obliged"><i>obliged</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="compelled"><i>compelled</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="bound"><i>bound</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="handsome"><i>handsome</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="pretty"><i>pretty</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="fine-looking"><i>fine-looking</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="good-looking"><i>good-looking</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="well-favoured"><i>well-favoured</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="beautiful"><i>beautiful</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="comely"><i>comely</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="fair"><i>fair</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="bright"><i>bright</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="shiny"><i>shiny</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="polished"><i>polished</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="shiny"><i>shiny</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="glossy"><i>glossy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="healthy"><i>healthy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="comfortable"><i>comfortable</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="friend"><i>friend</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="companion"><i>companion</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="wholesome"><i>wholesome</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="healthy"><i>healthy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="dress up"><i>dress<b/>up</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="overdress"><i>overdress</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="deck up"><i>deck<b/>up</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="fancy up"><i>fancy<b/>up</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="deck out"><i>deck<b/>out</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="get up"><i>get<b/>up</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="tog up"><i>tog<b/>up</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="tog out"><i>tog<b/>out</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="forward"><i>forward</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="iron"><i>iron</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="ugly"><i>ugly</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="vile"><i>vile</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="frightful"><i>frightful</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="horrifying"><i>horrifying</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="horrible"><i>horrible</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="despicable"><i>despicable</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="slimy"><i>slimy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="unworthy"><i>unworthy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="worthless"><i>worthless</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="wretched"><i>wretched</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="jagged"><i>jagged</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="toothed"><i>toothed</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="notched"><i>notched</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="sleepy"><i>sleepy</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="slender"><i>slender</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="thin"><i>thin</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="slim"><i>slim</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="lean"><i>lean</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="dawn"><i>dawn</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="first light"><i>first<b/>light</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="daybreak"><i>daybreak</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="break of day"><i>break<b/>of<b/>day</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="break of the day"><i>break<b/>of<b/>the<b/>day</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="sunup"><i>sunup</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="rat"><i>rat</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="mouse"><i>mouse</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="stoat"><i>stoat</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="weasil"><i>weasil</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="cockroach"><i>cockroach</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="wizard"><i>wizard</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="magician"><i>magician</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="necromancer"><i>necromancer</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="occultist"><i>occultist</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="sorcerer"><i>sorcerer</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="grass"><i>grass</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="as"><i>as</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="about"><i>about</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="near"><i>near</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="because"><i>because</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="however"><i>however</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="myself"><i>myself</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="we"><i>we</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="there"><i>there</i><par n="tw"/></e>
<e lm="foolish"><i>foolish</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="glad"><i>glad</i><par n="tsuch"/></e>
<e lm="with"><i>with</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
<e lm="while"><i>while</i><par n="steadw"/></e>
